vi: Hình dạng mỏ kèn clarinet: Công thái học/có đường viền; Nhỏ nhắn; Dày; Truyền thống; Khác
en: Clarinet mouthpiece beak shape: Ergonomic/contoured; Slim; Thick; Traditional; Other
hu: Klarinétfúvóka csőrének alakja: Ergonomikus/kontúros; Vékony; Vastag; Hagyományos; Egyéb
ko: 클라리넷 마우스피스의 비크 모양: 인체공학적/곡선형; 슬림; 두꺼움; 전통적; 기타
nl: Klarinetmondstuk bekvorm: Ergonomisch/gevormd; Slank; Dik; Traditioneel; Anders
ja: クラリネットのマウスピースのShapes: エルゴノミック/曲線的; スリム; シック; トラディショナル; その他
pt-PT: Forma do bico do bocal do clarinete: Ergonómico/contornado; Fino; Grosso; Tradicional; Outro
it: Shapesdel becco del bocchino per clarinetto: Ergonomico/sagomato; Sottile; Spesso; Tradizionale; Altro
el: Σχήμα ράμφους επιστομίου κλαρινέτου: Εργονομικό/με καμπύλες; Λεπτό; Παχύ; Παραδοσιακό; Άλλο
de: Form des Klarinettenmundstückschnabels: Ergonomisch/konturiert; Schlank; Dick; Traditionell; Sonstige
ro-RO: Forma ciocului muștiucului de clarinet: Ergonomic/conturat; Subțire; Gros; Tradițional; Altele
sv: Klarinettmunstyckets näbbform: Ergonomisk/konturerad; Smal; Tjock; Traditionell; Annan
lt-LT: Klarneto kandiklio snapelio forma: Ergonomiškas / kontūruotas; Plonas; Storas; Tradicinis; Kita
tr: Klarnet beki gaga şekli: Ergonomik/konturlu; İnce; Kalın; Geleneksel; Diğer
cs: Tvar zobáčku hubičky klarinetu: Ergonomický/tvarovaný; Tenký; Silný; Tradiční; Jiné
fr: Forme du bec de clarinette: Ergonomique/profilé; Fin; Épais; Traditionnel; Autre
zh-CN: 单簧管吹嘴形状: 人体工学/流线型; 纤细型; 厚实型; 传统型; 其他
pt-BR: Formato do bico da boquilha de clarinete: Ergonômico/contornado; Fino; Grosso; Tradicional; Outro
sk-SK: Tvar zobáka klarinetového náustku: Ergonomický/tvarovaný; Tenký; Hrubý; Tradičný; Iné
ru: Форма клюва мундштука кларнета: Эргономичная / контурная; Тонкая; Толстая; Традиционная; Другая
th: รูปทรงของปลายปากเป่าคลาริเน็ต: ตามหลักสรีรศาสตร์/เข้ารูป; เพรียวบาง; หนา; ดั้งเดิม; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Oblika jezička ustnika za klarinet: Ergonomsko/oblikovano; Ozko; Debelo; Tradicionalno; Drugo
hr-HR: Oblik usnika za klarinet: Ergonomski/konturirani; Tanki; Debeli; Tradicionalni; Ostalo
zh-TW: 單簧管吹嘴喙部形狀: 人體工學/服貼狀; 纖細; 厚實; 傳統; 其他
pl: Kształt dzioba ustnika klarnetowego: Ergonomiczny / wyprofilowany; Smukły; Gruby; Tradycyjny; Inny
es: Forma de la boquilla del clarinete: Ergonómico/contorneado; Delgado; Grueso; Tradicional; Otro
da: Klarinetmundstykkets spidsform: Ergonomisk/kontureret; Slank; Tyk; Traditionel; Andet
nb: Klarinettmunnstykkes spissform: Ergonomisk / konturert; Slank; Tykk; Tradisjonell; Annen
fi: Klarinetin suukappaleen nokan muoto: Ergonominen/muotoiltu; Ohut; Paksu; Perinteinen; Muu
bg-BG: Форма на върха (клюна) на мундщука за кларинет: Ергономичен/контуриран; Тънък; Дебел; Традиционен; Друго